Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.030

Must teach morality and patriotism.

It shall be the duty of all teachers to endeavor to impress on the minds of their pupils the principles of morality, truth, justice, temperance, humanity and patriotism; to teach them to avoid idleness, profanity and falsehood; to instruct them in the principles of free government, and to train them up to the true comprehension of the rights, duty and dignity of American citizenship.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.67.110. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 308 s 8; RRS s 4855; prior: 1897 c 118 s 58; 1890 p 371 s 42; 1886 p 19 s 50; Code 1881 s 3203. Formerly RCW 28A.67.110, 28.67.110.]